Louisiana, session 2026, HB383.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1.A. There are hereby appropriated the amounts shown below, which shall
be payable out of the state general fund, to the extent of funds deposited, unless otherwise
specified, for the establishment and reestablishment of agency ancillary funds which shall
be specifically known as internal service funds, auxiliary accounts, or enterprise funds. The
monies in each fund shall be used for working capital in the conduct of business enterprises
rendering public service, auxiliary service, and interagency service.
B. In the conduct of each such business, receipts shall be deposited in the state
treasury and disbursements made by the state treasurer to the extent of the amount deposited
to the credit of each ancillary fund, for the current fiscal year. All funds appropriated herein
shall be expended in compliance with the public bid laws of the state.
Section 2.A. Except as otherwise provided by law or as herein otherwise provided,
any fund equity resulting from prior year operations shall be included as a resource of the
fund from which the ancillary fund is directly or indirectly derived.
B. Funds on deposit with the state treasury at the close of the fiscal year are
authorized to be transferred to each fund respectively, as equity for the next fiscal year. All
unexpended cash balances as of June 30, 2027, shall be remitted to the state treasurer on or
before August 14, 2027. If not reestablished in the subsequent year's Act, the agency must
liquidate all assets and return all advances no later than August 14, 2027.
Page 1 of 8

HB NO. 383 ENROLLED
C. The program descriptions contained in this Act are not part of the law and are not
enacted into law by virtue of their inclusion into this Act.
Section 3.A. All money from federal, interagency transfers, statutory dedications,
or fees and self-generated revenues shall be available for expenditure in the amounts herein
appropriated.
B. Any increase in such revenues shall be available for allotment and expenditure
by an agency on approval of an increase in the appropriation by the commissioner of
administration and the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget. Any increase in such
revenues for an agency without an appropriation from the respective revenue source shall
be incorporated into the agency's appropriation on approval of the commissioner of
administration and the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget.
Section 4.A. The figures in parentheses following the designation of a budget entity
are the total authorized positions and authorized other charges positions for that entity. The
number of employees approved for each agency, as a result of the passage of this Act, may
be increased by the commissioner of administration when sufficient documentation is
presented and the request is deemed valid. However, any request which exceeds five
positions shall be approved by the commissioner of administration and the Joint Legislative
Committee on the Budget.
B. The budget request of any agency with an appropriation level of thirty million
dollars or more shall include within its existing table of organization positions which
perform the function of internal auditing, including the position of a chief audit executive.
The chief audit executive shall be responsible for ensuring that the internal audit function
adheres to the Institute of Internal Auditors, Global Internal Audit Standards. The chief
audit executive shall maintain organizational independence in accordance with these
standards and shall have direct and unrestricted access to the commission, board, secretary,
or equivalent head of the agency. The chief audit executive shall certify to the commission,
board, secretary, or equivalent head of the agency that the internal audit function conforms
to the Institute of Internal Auditors, Global Internal Audit Standards.
Section 5. All key and supporting performance objectives and indicators for the
departments, agencies, programs, and budget units contained in the Governor’s Executive
Budget Supporting Document shall be adjusted by the commissioner of administration to
Page 2 of 8

HB NO. 383 ENROLLED
reflect the funds appropriated therein. The commissioner of administration shall report on
these adjustments to the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget each year by August
fifteenth.
Section 6. The following definition is provided for the terms of this Act: "working
capital" shall be considered the excess of current assets over current liabilities on an accrual
basis.
Section 7. Should any section, subsection, clause, sentence, phrase, or part of the Act
for any reason be held, deemed, or construed to be unconstitutional or invalid, such decisions
shall not affect the remaining provisions of the Act, and the legislature hereby declares that
it would have passed the Act, and each section, subsection, clause, sentence, phrase, or part
thereof, irrespective of the fact that one or more of the sections, subsections, clauses,
sentences, phrases, or parts thereof, is declared unconstitutional or invalid. To this end, the
provisions of this Act are hereby declared severable.
Section 8. Internal Service Funds. These funds account for the financing of goods
or services provided by one department or agency to other departments or agencies of the
governmental unit, or to other governmental units, on a cost-reimbursement basis. Excess
cash funds, excluding cash funds arising from working capital advances, shall be invested
by the state treasurer with the interest proceeds therefrom credited to each account and shall
not be transferred to the state general fund.
Section 9. In conjunction with the continuing assessment of the existing staff, assets,
contracts, and facilities of each department, agency, program or budget unit’s information
technology resources and procurement resources, upon completion of this assessment and
to the extent optimization of these resources will result in the projected cost savings through
staff reductions, realization of operational efficiencies, cost avoidance, and elimination of
asset duplication, the commissioner of administration is authorized to transfer the functions,
positions, assets, and funds from any other department, agency, program, or budget units
related to these optimizations to a different department. The provisions of this Section shall
not apply to the Department of Culture, Recreation and Tourism, or any agency contained
in Schedule 04, Elected Officials, of the General Appropriation Act.
Page 3 of 8

HB NO. 383 ENROLLED
SCHEDULE 21
ANCILLARY APPROPRIATIONS
21-800 OFFICE OF GROUP BENEFITS
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
State Group Benefits -
Authorized Positions (56) (56)
Expenditures $ 1,979,124,719 $ 2,170,674,411
Program Description: Provides for the administration of group health and accidental
insurance and group life insurance for current and former state employees and other
participating groups.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 1,979,124,719 $ 2,170,674,411
MEANS OF FINANCE:
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 1,098,733 $ 1,098,733
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 1,978,025,986 $ 2,169,575,678
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING $ 1,979,124,719 $ 2,170,674,411
Payable out of the State General Fund by
Fees and Self-generated Revenues to the
State Group Benefits Program to align
with projected expenditure needs $ 100,000,000
21-804 OFFICE OF RISK MANAGEMENT
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Risk Management -
Authorized Positions (43) (42)
Expenditures $ 305,700,399 $ 305,409,497
Program Description: Provides for the overall executive leadership and management of
the office, support services, policy analysis, management direction of the state's self-
insurance program; provides funding for the payment of losses on medical, malpractice,
property, comprehensive general liability, personal injury, automobile liability, automobile
physical damage, bonds, crime, aviation, wet marine boiler and machinery and
miscellaneous tort claims; provides funding for the payment of contracts issued for
professional legal defense of claims made against the state; provides funding for the
reimbursement of the Division of Risk Litigation in the Office of the Attorney General for
costs incurred for professional legal defense of claims made against the state.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 305,700,399 $ 305,409,497
MEANS OF FINANCE:
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 281,158,551 $ 281,202,131
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 22,541,848 $ 22,207,366
Statutory Dedications:
Future Medical Care Fund $ 2,000,000 $ 2,000,000
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING $ 305,700,399 $ 305,409,497
21-806 LOUISIANA PROPERTY ASSISTANCE AGENCY
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Louisiana Property Assistance -
Page 4 of 8

HB NO. 383 ENROLLED
Authorized Positions (37) (37)
Expenditures $ 20,476,316 $ 20,310,725
Program Description: Provides for the accountability of the state's movable property
through the development and implementation of sound management practices.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 20,476,316 $ 20,310,725
MEANS OF FINANCE:
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 1,615,846 $ 1,615,846
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 18,860,470 $ 18,694,879
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING $ 20,476,316 $ 20,310,725
21-807 LOUISIANA FEDERAL PROPERTY ASSISTANCE AGENCY
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Federal Property Assistance -
Authorized Positions (9) (9)
Expenditures $ 3,509,325 $ 3,298,837
Program Description: Seeks to assure the fair and equitable distribution of federal
property allocated to Louisiana by the General Services Administration to eligible Louisiana
donees.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 3,509,325 $ 3,298,837
MEANS OF FINANCE:
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 1,084,342 $ 1,084,342
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 2,424,983 $ 2,214,495
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING $ 3,509,325 $ 3,298,837
21-811 PRISON ENTERPRISES
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Prison Enterprises -
Authorized Positions (72) (72)
Expenditures $ 37,142,506 $ 36,992,277
Program Description: Utilizes the resources of the Department of Public Safety and
Corrections in the production of food, fiber, and other necessary items used by offenders in
order to lower the cost of incarceration; provides products and services to state agencies
and agencies of parishes, municipalities, and other political subdivisions; and provides work
opportunities for offenders. Prison Enterprises conducts both industry operations and
agriculture operations.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 37,142,506 $ 36,992,277
MEANS OF FINANCE:
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 27,464,660 $ 27,332,778
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 9,677,846 $ 9,659,499
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING $ 37,142,506 $ 36,992,277
EXPENDITURES:
Payment to the Prison Enterprises Program
for personal services for a pay increase for
Correction Services officers $ 16,155
Page 5 of 8

HB NO. 383 ENROLLED
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 16,155
MEANS OF FINANCE:
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 11,470
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 4,685
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING $ 16,155
21-815 OFFICE OF TECHNOLOGY SERVICES
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Technology Services -
Authorized Positions (847) (884)
Authorized Other Charges Positions (9) (0)
Expenditures $ 670,850,471 $ 713,627,872
Program Description: The mission of the Office of Technology Services (OTS) is to
establish competitive, cost-effective technology systems and services while acting as the sole
centralized customer for the acquisition, billing and record keeping of those technology
services. OTS shall charge respective user agencies for the cost of the technology and
services provided including the cost of the operation of the office in a fair, equitable, and
consistent manner, in full compliance with State of Louisiana statutes.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 670,850,471 $ 713,627,872
MEANS OF FINANCE:
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 669,331,998 $ 708,501,540
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 1,518,473 $ 5,126,332
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING $ 670,850,471 $ 713,627,872
21-816 DIVISION OF ADMINISTRATIVE LAW
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Administration -
Authorized Positions (59) (59)
Expenditures $ 9,634,438 $ 11,965,367
Program Description: Provides a neutral forum for handling administrative hearings for
certain state agencies, with respect for the dignity of individuals and their due process
rights.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 9,634,438 $ 11,965,367
MEANS OF FINANCE:
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 9,605,541 $ 11,936,470
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 28,897 $ 28,897
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING $ 9,634,438 $ 11,965,367
21-820 OFFICE OF STATE PROCUREMENT
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Office of State Procurement -
Authorized Positions (99) (99)
Expenditures $ 13,254,634 $ 13,399,493
Page 6 of 8

HB NO. 383 ENROLLED
Program Description: The mission of the Office of State Procurement is to provide cost-
effective services that satisfy the needs of approved governmental units of the State of
Louisiana through the management of products and services.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 13,254,634 $ 13,399,493
MEANS OF FINANCE:
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 2,583,342 $ 2,612,070
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 10,671,292 $ 10,787,423
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING $ 13,254,634 $ 13,399,493
21-829 OFFICE OF AIRCRAFT SERVICES
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Flight Maintenance -
Authorized Positions (4) (0)
Expenditures $ 3,814,159 $ 0
Program Description: The mission of the Office of Aircraft Services is to manage the
overall maintenance and provide all needed and required support for safe, proper, and
economic operation of the State’s various aircraft. Flight Maintenance Operations ensures
flight safety, maintains high safety standards while minimizing aircraft downtime for repairs,
and provides high quality, efficient, and economical repair and fueling services for state-
operated aircraft.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 3,814,159 $ 0
MEANS OF FINANCE:
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 3,634,944 $ 0
Fees & Self-generated Revenues $ 179,215 $ 0
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING $ 3,814,159 $ 0
21-860 ENVIRONMENTAL STATE REVOLVING LOAN FUNDS
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Environmental State Revolving Loan Fund $ 126,519,000 $ 126,519,000
Program Description: The Water Planning and Assessment Division in conjunction with
the Financial Services Division - State Revolving Fund Section strive to uphold Title VI and
amended section 221 of the federal Clean Water Act and to protect the health and welfare
of the citizens of the state, as well as to enhance the environment of the state by
administering the Clean Water State Revolving Fund and the Sewer Overflow and
Stormwater Reuse Municipal Grants Program. The Remediation Division's Brownfields
Program, in conjunction with the Financial Services Division, strives to uphold the Small
Business Liability Relief and Brownfields Revitalization Act and 2018 Brownfields
Utilization, Investment, and Local Development (BUILD) Act to address environmental
concerns at vacant and underutilized properties to facilitate their reuse and to support
community revitalization.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 126,519,000 $ 126,519,000
MEANS OF FINANCE:
State General Fund by:
Statutory Dedications:
Clean Water State Revolving Fund $ 125,000,000 $ 123,969,000
Brownfields Cleanup Revolving
Page 7 of 8

HB NO. 383 ENROLLED
Loan Fund $ 350,000 $ 350,000
Federal Funds $ 1,169,000 $ 2,200,000
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING $ 126,519,000 $ 126,519,000
21-861 DRINKING WATER REVOLVING LOAN FUND
EXPENDITURES: FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
Drinking Water Revolving Loan Fund $ 66,707,202 $ 66,707,202
Program Description: Assist public water systems in financing needed drinking water
infrastructure improvements (e.g. treatment plant, distribution main replacement, storage
facilities, new wells). The Drinking Water Revolving Loan Fund provides assistance in the
form of low-interest loans and technical assistance to public water systems in Louisiana to
assist them with complying with state and federal drinking water regulations, ensuring that
their customers are provided with safe drinking water thereby protecting the public health.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES $ 66,707,202 $ 66,707,202
MEANS OF FINANCE:
State General Fund by:
Statutory Dedications:
Drinking Water Revolving Loan Fund $ 66,707,202 $ 66,707,202
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING $ 66,707,202 $ 66,707,202
Section 10. This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 8 of 8